Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Bonds" means the bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the commission, the interest paid on which may or may not qualify for tax exemption.

(2) "Certifying authority" means: (a) For improvements involving solar electric systems, the Washington climate and rural energy development center at Washington State University, established under RCW 28B.30.642; or (b) for all other energy efficiency and renewable energy improvements, any utility company or other institution qualified to assess and certify the feasibility and benefit of energy efficiency and renewable energy improvements in a manner that is efficient and minimizes the amount of time or cost.

(3) "Code" means the federal internal revenue code of 1954, as now or hereafter amended, and the regulations and rulings promulgated thereunder.

(4) "Commission" means the Washington state housing finance commission or any board, body, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon the commission shall be given by law.

(5) "Costs of housing" means all costs related to the development, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, leasing, rehabilitation, and other improvements of housing, as determined by the commission.

(6) "Eligible applicant" means, with respect to the sustainable energy trust program, an owner of a residential, agricultural, commercial, state, or municipal property.

(7) "Eligible person" means a person or family eligible in accordance with standards promulgated by the commission. Such persons shall include those persons whose income is insufficient to obtain at a reasonable cost, without financial assistance, decent, safe, and sanitary housing in the area in which the person or family resides, and may include such other persons whom the commission determines to be eligible.

(8) "Energy efficiency improvement" means an installation or modification that is designed to reduce energy consumption in residential, agricultural, commercial, state, or municipal properties. The term includes, but is not limited to: Insulation; storm windows and doors; automatic energy control systems; heating, ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution system modifications or replacements in buildings or central plants; caulking and weather stripping; energy recovery systems; geothermal heat pumps; and day lighting systems.

(9) "Housing" means specific new, existing, or improved residential dwellings within this state or dwellings to be constructed within this state. The term includes land, buildings, and manufactured dwellings, and improvements, furnishings, and equipment, and such other nonhousing facilities, furnishings, equipment, and costs as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto if in the judgment of the commission the facilities, furnishings, equipment and costs are an integral part of the project. Housing may consist of single-family or multifamily dwellings in one or more structures located on contiguous or noncontiguous parcels or any combination thereof. Improvements may include such equipment and materials as are appropriate to accomplish energy efficiency within a dwelling. The term also includes a dwelling constructed by a person who occupies and owns the dwelling, and nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

(10) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, mortgage deed, deed of trust, security agreement, or other instrument securing a mortgage loan and constituting a lien on or security interest in housing. The property may be held in fee simple or on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term, at the time the mortgage is acquired, of not less than the term of repayment of the mortgage loan secured by the mortgage. The property may also be housing which is evidenced by an interest in a cooperative association or corporation if ownership of the interest entitles the owner of the interest to occupancy of a dwelling owned by the association or corporation.

(11) "Mortgage lender" means any of the following entities which customarily provide service or otherwise aid in the financing of housing and which are approved as a mortgage lender by the commission: A bank, trust company, savings bank, national banking association, savings and loan association, building and loan association, mortgage banker, mortgage company, credit union, life insurance company, or any other financial institution, governmental agency, municipal corporation, or any holding company for any of the entities specified in this subsection.

(12) "Mortgage loan" means an interest-bearing loan or a participation therein, made to a borrower, for the purpose of financing the costs of housing, evidenced by a promissory note, and which may or may not be secured (a) under a mortgage agreement, (b) under any other security agreement, regardless of whether the collateral is personal or real property, or (c) by insurance or a loan guarantee of a third party. However, an unsecured loan shall not be considered a mortgage loan under this definition unless the amount of the loan is under two thousand five hundred dollars.

(13) "Qualified improvement" means an energy efficiency improvement which has been approved by a certifying authority or a net metering system as defined under RCW 80.60.010.

[ 2009 c 65 s 2; 1990 c 167 s 1; 1983 c 161 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2009 c 65: "The legislature intends to promote the development of renewable energy technologies and the application of energy efficiency measures by authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds to finance renewable energy and energy efficiency improvement costs. The legislature finds that by providing access to low-cost capital to finance renewable energy and energy efficiency projects, a key barrier is eliminated." [ 2009 c 65 s 1.]